Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.250

Inspection of instrument or device to determine if correct—Rejection or seizure—Confiscation or destruction—Use of incorrect instrument or device—Notice.

(1) If the director or a city sealer discovers upon inspection that a weighing or measuring instrument or device is "incorrect," but in his or her best judgment is susceptible of satisfactory repair, he or she shall reject and mark or tag as rejected any such weighing or measuring instrument or device.

(2) The director or a city sealer may reject or seize any weighing or measuring instrument or device found to be incorrect that, in his or her best judgment, is not susceptible of satisfactory repair.

(3) Weighing or measuring instruments or devices that have been rejected under subsection (1) of this section may be confiscated and may be destroyed by the director or a city sealer if not corrected as required by RCW 19.94.255 or if used or disposed of contrary to the requirements of that section.

(4) The director or a city sealer shall permit the use of an incorrect weighing or measuring instrument or device, pending repairs, if the device is incorrect to the economic benefit of the consumer and the consumer is not the seller. However, if the director or city sealer finds such an error, the director or city sealer shall notify the owner of the instrument or device, or the owner's representative at the business location, regarding the error.

[ 1995 c 355 s 11; 1992 c 237 s 16; 1991 sp.s. c 23 s 10; 1969 c 67 s 25.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective dates—1995 c 355: See notes following RCW 19.94.015.

Legislative findings—Intent—1991 sp.s. c 23: See notes following RCW 19.94.150.